Washington statutes.
RCW 36.33.010

Current expense fund.

Every county shall maintain a current expense fund to which shall be credited all taxes levied for that purpose and all fees collected, fines assessed, and forfeitures adjudged in the county the proceeds of which have not been specifically allocated to any other purpose.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.33.010. Prior: 1945 c 85 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 5634-1.]

NOTES:

Moneys paid from for

disinfection of horticultural premises: Chapter 15.08 RCW.

public health pooling fund: RCW 70.12.040.

weed district taxes on county lands: RCW 17.04.180.

Moneys paid into from

disinfection of horticultural premises tax: RCW 15.08.170.

horticultural tax funds: RCW 15.08.260.

unclaimed property in hands of sheriff, sale of: RCW 63.40.030.

use tax on vehicles, auditor's collection fees: RCW 82.12.045.

vehicle registration filing fees: RCW 46.68.400.

vehicle use tax collection fees: RCW 82.12.045.

violations bureau funds: RCW 3.30.090.